Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20147-208
Commission on Public
Advocacy; solicit and receive donations.

The Commission
on Public Advocacy may solicit and receive donations from law schools, corporations,
nonprofit organizations, bar associations, bar foundations, law firms, individuals,
or other sources for purposes of the Legal Education for Public Service and Rural Practice Loan Repayment Assistance Act. The donations
shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Legal Education
for Public Service and Rural
Practice Loan Repayment Assistance Fund.

Laws 2008, LB1014, § 26;
w
Laws 2014, LB907, § 8.
July 18, 2014